tests/cases_of_word_horse.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Ат cases":
    ат<n><sg><nom> : ат
    ат<n><attr> : ат
    ат<n><sg><acc> : аты
    ат<n><sg><par> : атта
    ат<n><sg><dat> : акка
    ат<n><sg><abl> : аттан
    ат<n><sg><ins> : атынан
    ат<n><sg><com> : аттыын
    ат<n><sg><comp> : аттааҕар

    ат<n><pl><nom> : аттар
    ат<n><pl><acc> : аттары
    ат<n><pl><par> : аттарда
    ат<n><pl><dat> : аттарга
    ат<n><pl><abl> : аттартан
    ат<n><pl><ins> : аттарынан
    ат<n><pl><com> : аттардыын
    ат<n><pl><comp> : аттардааҕар

#  "Possessive cases singular": 
 
    ат<n><sg><px1sg><nom> : атым
    ат<n><sg><px1sg><acc> : аппын
    ат<n><sg><px1sg><par> : аппына
    ат<n><sg><px1sg><dat> : аппар
    ат<n><sg><px1sg><abl> : аппыттан
    ат<n><sg><px1sg><ins> : аппынан
    ат<n><sg><px1sg><com> : аппыныын
    ат<n><sg><px1sg><comp> : аппынааҕар

#  Word "ап" in some cases coincides with "ат"
    ап<n><sg><px1sg><acc> : аппын
    ап<n><sg><px1sg><par> : аппына
    ап<n><sg><px1sg><dat> : аппар
    ап<n><sg><px1sg><abl> : аппыттан
    ап<n><sg><px1sg><ins> : аппынан
    ап<n><sg><px1sg><com> : аппыныын
    ап<n><sg><px1sg><comp> : аппынааҕар

    ат<n><sg><px2sg><nom> : атыҥ
    ат<n><sg><px2sg><acc> : аккын
    ат<n><sg><px2sg><par> : аккына
    ат<n><sg><px2sg><dat> : аккар
    ат<n><sg><px2sg><abl> : аккыттан
    ат<n><sg><px2sg><ins> : аккынан
    ат<n><sg><px2sg><com> : аккыныын
    ат<n><sg><px2sg><comp> : аккынааҕар

    ат<n><sg><px3sg><nom> : ата
    ат<n><sg><px3sg><acc> : атын
    атын<n><sg><nom> : атын
    атын<n><attr> : атын
    ат<n><sg><px3sg><par> : атына
    атын<n><sg><px3sg><nom> : атына
    ат<n><sg><px3sg><dat> : атыгар
    ат<n><sg><px3sg><abl> : атыттан
    ат<n><sg><px3sg><ins> : атынан
    ат<n><sg><px3sg><com> : атыныын
    ат<n><sg><px3sg><comp> : атынааҕар

    ат<n><sg><px1pl><nom> : аппыт
    ат<n><sg><px1pl><acc> : аппытын
    ат<n><sg><px1pl><par> : аппытына
    ат<n><sg><px1pl><dat> : аппытыгар
    ат<n><sg><px1pl><abl> : аппытыттан
    ат<n><sg><px1pl><ins> : аппытынан
    ат<n><sg><px1pl><com> : аппытыныын
    ат<n><sg><px1pl><comp> : аппытынааҕар

#  Word "ап" in some cases coincides with "ат"
    ап<n><sg><px1pl><nom> : аппыт
    ап<n><sg><px1pl><acc> : аппытын
    ап<n><sg><px1pl><par> : аппытына
    ап<n><sg><px1pl><dat> : аппытыгар
    ап<n><sg><px1pl><abl> : аппытыттан
    ап<n><sg><px1pl><ins> : аппытынан
    ап<n><sg><px1pl><com> : аппытыныын
    ап<n><sg><px1pl><comp> : аппытынааҕар

    ат<n><sg><px2pl><nom> : аккыт
    ат<n><sg><px2pl><acc> : аккытын
    ат<n><sg><px2pl><par> : аккытына
    ат<n><sg><px2pl><dat> : аккытыгар
    ат<n><sg><px2pl><abl> : аккытыттан
    ат<n><sg><px2pl><ins> : аккытынан
    ат<n><sg><px2pl><com> : аккытыныын
    ат<n><sg><px2pl><comp> : аккытынааҕар

    ат<n><sg><px3pl><nom> : аттара
    ат<n><sg><px3pl><acc> : аттарын
    ат<n><sg><px3pl><par> : аттарына
    ат<n><sg><px3pl><dat> : аттарыгар
    ат<n><sg><px3pl><abl> : аттарыттан
    ат<n><sg><px3pl><ins> : аттарынан
    ат<n><sg><px3pl><com> : аттарыныын
    ат<n><sg><px3pl><comp> : аттарынааҕар


#  "Possessive cases plural": 
 
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : аттарым
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : аттарбын
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><par> : аттарбына
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><dat> : аттарбар
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><abl> : аттарбыттан
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><ins> : аттарбынан
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><com> : аттарбыныын
    ат<n><pl><px1sg><comp> : аттарбынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px2sg><nom> : аттарыҥ
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : аттаргын
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><par> : аттаргына
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><dat> : аттаргар
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><abl> : аттаргыттан
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><ins> : аттаргынан
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><com> : аттаргыныын
    ат<n><pl><px2sg><comp> : аттаргынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px3sg><nom> : аттара
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><acc> : аттарын
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><par> : аттарына
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><dat> : аттарыгар
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><abl> : аттарыттан
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><ins> : аттарынан
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><com> : аттарыныын
    ат<n><pl><px3sg><comp> : аттарынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : аттарбыт
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><acc> : аттарбытын
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><par> : аттарбытына
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><dat> : аттарбытыгар
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><abl> : аттарбытыттан
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><ins> : аттарбытынан
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><com> : аттарбытыныын
    ат<n><pl><px1pl><comp> : аттарбытынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : аттаргыт
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><acc> : аттаргытын
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><par> : аттаргытына
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><dat> : аттаргытыгар
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><abl> : аттаргытыттан
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><ins> : аттаргытынан
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><com> : аттаргытыныын
    ат<n><pl><px2pl><comp> : аттаргытынааҕар

    ат<n><pl><px3pl><nom> : аттара
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><acc> : аттарын
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><par> : аттарына
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><dat> : аттарыгар
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><abl> : аттарыттан
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><ins> : аттарынан
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><com> : аттарыныын
    ат<n><pl><px3pl><comp> : аттарынааҕар

# additional forms from base АП:

    ап<n><sg><comp>  : аптааҕар
                     
    ап<n><sg><loc><attr> : аптааҕы
    ап<n><sg><loc><subst><nom> : аптааҕы

    аптаах<n><sg><acc> : аптааҕы


# don't know how to test with yaml:
# this form ЬЬЬЬЬ is ILLEGAL and should not be analyzed ...
#    ььььь+? : ььььь
